src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON CNJ-64
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{оеэØ%}влимизь Derya ;
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{оеэØ%}влимезь Derya ;
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{оеэØ%}влемезь Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-64_VOL
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{оеэØ%}в%{ое%}лимизь Derya ;
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{оеэØ%}в%{ое%}лемезь Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-65
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.65@+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.65@%>%{оеэØ%}влидизь Derya ;
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.65@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.65@%>%{оеэØ%}влидезь Derya ;
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.65@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.65@%>%{оеэØ%}вледезь Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-65_VOL
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.65@+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.65@%>%{оеэØ%}в%{ое%}лидизь Derya ;
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.65@+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.65@%>%{оеэØ%}в%{ое%}ледезь Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-66
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.66@+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.66@%>%{оеэØ%}влизь Derya ;
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.66@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.66@%>%{оеэØ%}влезь Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-66_VOL
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.66@+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.66@%>%{оеэØ%}в%{ое%}лизь Derya ;
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.66@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@@U.CONJ-PX.66@%>%{оеэØ%}в%{ое%}лезь Derya ;


!! redo conj 2012-11-07 end


LEXICON CONJUNCTIVE-ALL
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ Conjunctive-Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.13@ Conjunctive-Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.16@ Conjunctive-Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.23@ Conjunctive-Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.26@ Conjunctive-Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.33@ Conjunctive-Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.36@ Conjunctive-Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.43@ Conjunctive-Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.46@ Conjunctive-Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.53@ Conjunctive-Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.56@ Conjunctive-Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.63@ Conjunctive-Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.66@ Conjunctive-Obj ;

 CNJ-10 ;
 CNJ-20 ;
 CNJ-30 ;
 CNJ-40 ;
 CNJ-50 ;
 CNJ-60 ;


LEXICON Conjunctive-Obj
 CNJ-12 ;
 CNJ-13 ;
 CNJ-15 ;
 CNJ-16 ;
 CNJ-21 ;
 CNJ-23 ;
 CNJ-24 ;
 CNJ-26 ;
 CNJ-31 ;
 CNJ-32 ;
 CNJ-33 ;
 CNJ-34 ;
 CNJ-35 ;
 CNJ-36 ;
 CNJ-42 ;
 CNJ-43 ;
 CNJ-45 ;
 CNJ-46 ;
 CNJ-51 ;
 CNJ-53 ;
 CNJ-54 ;
 CNJ-56 ;
 CNJ-61 ;
 CNJ-62 ;
 CNJ-63 ;
 CNJ-64 ;
 CNJ-65 ;
 CNJ-66 ;

!! begin
LEXICON CNJ-withO-10
@U.CONJ-PX.10@+ScSg1:@U.CONJ-PX.10@в%{ое%}линь  Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-12
@U.CONJ-PX.12@+ScSg1+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-PX.12@в%{ое%}литинь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-13
!@U.CONJ-PX.13@!+ScSg1+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-PX.13@в%{ое%}лия Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-15
!@U.CONJ-PX.15@!+ScSg1+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-PX.15@в%{ое%}лидизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-16
!@U.CONJ-PX.16@!+ScSg1+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-PX.16@в%{ое%}линь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-20
!@U.CONJ-PX.20@!+ScSg2:@U.CONJ-PX.20@в%{ое%}лить Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-21
!@U.CONJ-PX.21@!+ScSg2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-PX.21@в%{ое%}лимик Derya_KLoss ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-23
!@U.CONJ-PX.23@!+ScSg2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-PX.23@в%{ое%}лик Derya_KLoss ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-24
!@U.CONJ-PX.24@!+ScSg2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-PX.24@в%{ое%}лимизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-26
!@U.CONJ-PX.26@!+ScSg2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-PX.26@в%{ое%}лить Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-31
!@U.CONJ-PX.31@!+ScSg3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-PX.31@в%{ое%}лимим Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-32
!@U.CONJ-PX.32@!+ScSg3+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-PX.32@в%{ое%}линзеть Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-33
!@U.CONJ-PX.33@!+ScSg3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-PX.33@в%{ое%}лизе Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-34
!@U.CONJ-PX.34@!+ScSg3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-PX.34@в%{ое%}лимизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-35
!@U.CONJ-PX.35@!+ScSg3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-PX.35@в%{ое%}лидизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-36
!@U.CONJ-PX.36@!+ScSg3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-PX.36@в%{ое%}линзе Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-40
!@U.CONJ-PX.40@!+ScPl1:@U.CONJ-PX.40@в%{ое%}линек Derya_KLoss ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-42
!@U.CONJ-PX.42@!+ScPl1+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-PX.42@в%{ое%}лидизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-43
!@U.CONJ-PX.43@!+ScPl1+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-PX.43@в%{ое%}линек Derya_KLoss ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-45
!@U.CONJ-PX.45@!+ScPl1+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-PX.45@в%{ое%}лидизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-46
!@U.CONJ-PX.46@!+ScPl1+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-PX.46@в%{ое%}линек Derya_KLoss ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-50
!@U.CONJ-PX.50@!+ScPl2:@U.CONJ-PX.50@в%{ое%}лиде Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-51
!@U.CONJ-PX.51@!+ScPl2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-PX.51@в%{ое%}лимизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-53
!@U.CONJ-PX.53@!+ScPl2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-PX.53@в%{ое%}линк Derya_KLoss ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-54
!@U.CONJ-PX.54@!+ScPl2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-PX.54@в%{ое%}лимизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-56
!@U.CONJ-PX.56@!+ScPl2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-PX.56@в%{ое%}линк Derya_KLoss ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-61
!@U.CONJ-PX.61@!+ScPl3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-PX.61@в%{ое%}лимизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-62
!@U.CONJ-PX.62@!+ScPl3+OcSg2:@U.CONJ-PX.62@в%{ое%}лидизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-63
!@U.CONJ-PX.63@!+ScPl3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-PX.63@в%{ое%}лизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-64
!@U.CONJ-PX.64@!+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-PX.64@в%{ое%}лимизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-65
!@U.CONJ-PX.65@!+ScPl3+OcPl2:@U.CONJ-PX.65@в%{ое%}лидизь Derya ;

!LEXICON CNJ-withO-66
!@U.CONJ-PX.66@!+ScPl3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-PX.66@в%{ое%}лизь Derya ;



LEXICON ConjPers-withO-all
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.13@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.16@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.23@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.26@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.33@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.36@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.43@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.46@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.53@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.56@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.63@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.66@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;

 CNJ-10_VOL ;
 CNJ-withO-10 ;
 CNJ-20_VOL ;
 CNJ-30 ;
 CNJ-40_VOL ;
 CNJ-50_VOL ;
 CNJ-60 ;


LEXICON ConjPers-withO-all_Obj
 CNJ-12_VOL ;
 CNJ-withO-12 ;
 CNJ-13_VOL ;
 CNJ-15_VOL ;
 CNJ-16_VOL ;
 CNJ-21_VOL ;
 CNJ-23_VOL ;
 CNJ-24_VOL ;
 CNJ-26_VOL ;
 CNJ-31_VOL ;
 CNJ-32_VOL ;
 CNJ-33_VOL ;
 CNJ-34_VOL ;
 CNJ-35_VOL ;
 CNJ-36_VOL ;
 CNJ-42_VOL ;
 CNJ-43_VOL ;
 CNJ-45_VOL ;
 CNJ-46_VOL ;
 CNJ-51_VOL ;
 CNJ-53_VOL ;
 CNJ-54_VOL ;
 CNJ-56_VOL ;
 CNJ-61_VOL ;
 CNJ-62_VOL ;
 CNJ-63_VOL ;
 CNJ-64_VOL ;
 CNJ-65_VOL ;
 CNJ-66_VOL ;


!! end

LEXICON Derya
+Pcle+Cond:деря VerbEnd_K ;
+Pcle+Cond:деряй VerbEnd_K ;
 VerbEnd_ImpK ;

!LEXICON ImpDerya
!+Pcle+Cond:деря VerbEnd_K ;
! VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON Derya_KLoss
+Pcle+Cond:деря VerbEnd_K ;
 VerbEnd_lak-ImpK ;


!! ## OPTATIVE 


LEXICON VA_ILJA
+Aux+Neg: VA_ILJA_01 ;
LEXICON VA_ILJA_01
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ Optative-noArrow ;
 ILYA_Obj ; !CHECKME 2017-11-16
: OPT-10 ;
: OPT-20 ;
: OPT-30 ;
: OPT-40 ;
: OPT-50 ;
: OPT-60 ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.20@+Imprt+ScSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.20@ VerbEnd_K ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.21@+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.21@%>%{оеэØ%}мак VerbEnd_ImpK ;

@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.23@+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.23@%>к VerbEnd_ImpK ;

@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.24@+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.24@%>%{оеэØ%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.26@+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.26@%>%{иы%}ть VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.26@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.26@%>%{иы%} VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.50@+Imprt+ScPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.50@%>%{оеэØ%}дО1 VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.51@+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.51@%>%{оеэØ%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.53@+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.53@%>%{иы%}нк VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.54@+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.54@%>%{оеэØ%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.56@+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.56@%>%{иы%}нк VerbEnd_ImpK ;

@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.21@+Prec+ScSg2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.21@%>%{оеэØ%}мака VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.23@+Prec+ScSg2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.23@%>ка VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.24@+Prec+ScSg2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.24@%>%{оеэØ%}мизьга VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.26@+Prec+ScSg2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.26@%>%{иы%}тя VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.50@+Prec+ScPl2:@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.50@%>%{оеэØ%}дО1я VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.51@+Prec+ScPl2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.51@%>%{оеэØ%}мизьга VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.53@+Prec+ScPl2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.53@%>%{иы%}нка VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.54@+Prec+ScPl2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.54@%>%{оеэØ%}мизьга VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.56@+Prec+ScPl2+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.PREC@@U.CONJ-PX.56@%>%{иы%}нка VerbEnd_ImpK ;


LEXICON ILYA_Obj
 OPT-12 ;
 OPT-13 ;
 OPT-15 ;
 OPT-16 ;
 OPT-21 ;
 OPT-23 ;
 OPT-24 ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.24@+Opt+ScSg2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.24@%>%{оеэØ%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.24@+Opt+ScSg2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.24@%>%{оеэØ%}змизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 OPT-26 ;
 OPT-31 ;
 OPT-32 ;
 OPT-33 ;
 OPT-34 ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.34@+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.34@%>%{оеэØ%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.34@+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.34@%>%{оеэØ%}змизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 OPT-35 ;
 OPT-36 ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.36@+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.36@%>%{иы%}нзе VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 OPT-42 ;
 OPT-43 ;
 OPT-45 ;
 OPT-46 ;
 OPT-51 ;
 OPT-53 ;
 OPT-54 ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@+Opt+ScPl2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@%>%{оеэØ%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@+Opt+ScPl2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@%>%{оеэØ%}змизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 OPT-56 ;
 OPT-61 ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@%>%{оеэØ%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@%>%{оеэØ%}змизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 OPT-62 ;
 OPT-63 ;
 OPT-64 ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{оеэØ%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@%>%{оеэØ%}змизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 OPT-65 ;
 OPT-66 ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@%>%{иы%}зь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@%>%{оеэØ%}зь VerbEnd_ImpK ;

@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@+Opt+ScPl2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@%>%{иы%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@+Opt+ScPl2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@%>%{иы%}змизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@%>%{иы%}зь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3:@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@%>%{оеэØ%}зь VerbEnd_ImpK ;





!! ## IMPERATIVE 


LEXICON IMPRT-20
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.20@+Imprt+ScSg2:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.20@%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%} VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Use/NG+Dial+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%} VerbEnd_ImpK_01 ;
@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Use/NG+Dial+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%} VerbEnd_deraj ;

LEXICON IMPRT-21
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.21@+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg1:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.21@%>%{оеэØ%}мак VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON IMPRT-23
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.23@+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.23@%>%{иы%}к VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON IMPRT-24
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.24@+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.24@%>%{оеэØ%}змизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.24@+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.24@%>%{оеэØ%}мизь VerbEnd_ImpK ;
